Utah statutes.
17B-1-104.   Property owner provisions.
(1)  For purposes of this title:
(a)  the owner of real property shall be:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), the fee title owner
according to the records of the county recorder on the date of the filing of
the request or petition; or
(ii)  for a proposed annexation under Part 4, Annexation, the lessee of
military land, as defined in Section 63H-1-102, if the area proposed for
annexation includes military land that is within a project area described in a
project area plan adopted by the military installation development authority
under Title 63H, Chapter 1, Military Installation Development Authority Act;
and
(b)  the value of private real property shall be determined according to the
last assessment before the filing of the request or petition, as determined
by:
(i)  the county under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 3, County Assessment, for
property subject to assessment by the county;
(ii)  the State Tax Commission under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 2, Assessment
of Property, for property subject to assessment by the State Tax Commission;
or
(iii)  the county, for all other property.
(2)  For purposes of each provision of this title that requires the owners of
private real property covering a percentage of the total private land area
within the proposed local district to sign a request, petition, or protest:
(a)  a parcel of real property may not be included in the calculation of the
required percentage unless the request or petition is signed by:
(i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), owners representing a
majority ownership interest in that parcel; or
(ii)  if the parcel is owned by joint tenants or tenants by the entirety, 50%
of the number of owners of that parcel;
(b)  the signature of a person signing a request or petition in a
representative capacity on behalf of an owner is invalid unless:
(i)  the person's representative capacity and the name of the owner the person
represents are indicated on the request or petition with the person's
signature; and
(ii)  the person provides documentation accompanying the request or petition
that reasonably substantiates the person's representative capacity; and
(c)  subject to Subsection (2)(b), a duly appointed personal representative
may sign a request or petition on behalf of a deceased owner.
